California statutes. Business and Professions Code
It is the intent of the Legislature that the Osteopathic Medical Board of California seek ways and means to identify and rehabilitate osteopathic physicians and surgeons whose competency may be impaired due to abuse of dangerous drugs and alcohol, so that osteopathic physicians and surgeons so afflicted may be treated and returned to the practice of medicine in a manner which will not endanger the public health and safety. It is also the intent of the Legislature that the Osteopathic Medical Board of California shall implement this legislation by establishing a diversion program as a voluntary alternative approach to traditional disciplinary actions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 359, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

2361.

As used in this article:

(a) “Board” means the Osteopathic Medical Board of California.

(b) “Diversion program” means a treatment program created by this article for osteopathic physicians and surgeons whose competency may be threatened or diminished due to abuse of drugs or alcohol.

(c) “Committee” means a diversion evaluation committee created by this article.

(d) “Participant” means a California-licensed osteopathic physician and surgeon.

(e) “Program manager” means the staff manager of the
 diversion program, as designated by the executive officer of the board. The program manager shall have background experience in dealing with substance abuse issues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 9.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2362.

One or more diversion evaluation committees are hereby created in the state to be established by the board. The board shall establish criteria and appoint the members of the committee pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 384, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2363.

Each member of the committee shall receive per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 384, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2364.

The board shall administer this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 384, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2365.

(a) The board shall establish criteria for the acceptance, denial, or termination of participants in the diversion program. Unless ordered by the board as a condition of disciplinary probation, only those participants who have voluntarily requested diversion treatment and supervision by a committee shall participate in the diversion program.

(b) A participant who is not the subject of a current investigation may self-refer to the diversion program on a confidential basis, except as provided in subdivision (f).

(c) A participant under current investigation by the board may also request entry into the diversion program by contacting the board’s Diversion Program Manager. The Diversion Program Manager may refer the participant requesting participation in the program to a diversion evaluation committee for evaluation of eligibility. Prior to authorizing a licentiate to enter into the diversion program, the Diversion Program Manager may require the licentiate, while under current investigation for any violations of the Medical Practice Act or other violations, to execute a statement of understanding that states that the licentiate understands that his or her violations of the Medical Practice Act or other statutes that would otherwise be the basis for discipline may still be investigated and the subject of disciplinary action.

(d) If the reasons for a current investigation of a participant are based primarily on the self-administration of any controlled substance or dangerous drugs or alcohol under Section 2239, or the illegal possession, prescription, or nonviolent procurement of any controlled substance or dangerous drugs for self-administration that does not involve actual, direct harm to the public, the board may close the investigation without further action if the licentiate is accepted into the board’s diversion program and successfully completes the requirements of the program. If the participant withdraws or is terminated from the program by a diversion evaluation committee, and the termination is approved by the program manager, the investigation may be reopened and disciplinary action imposed, if warranted, as determined by the board.

(e) Neither acceptance nor participation in the diversion program shall preclude the board from investigating or continuing to investigate, or taking disciplinary action or continuing to take disciplinary action against, any participant for any unprofessional conduct committed before, during, or after participation in the diversion program.

(f) All participants shall sign an agreement of understanding that the withdrawal or termination from the diversion program at a time when a diversion evaluation committee determines the licentiate presents a threat to the public’s health and safety shall result in the utilization by the board of diversion treatment records in disciplinary or criminal proceedings.

(g) Any participant terminated from the diversion program for failure to comply with program requirements is subject to disciplinary action by the board for acts committed before, during, and after participation in the diversion program. A participant who has been under investigation by the board and has been terminated from the diversion program by a diversion evaluation committee shall be reported by the diversion evaluation committee to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 548, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2366.

A committee created under this article operates under the direction of the diversion program manager. The program manager has the primary responsibility to review and evaluate recommendations of the committee. Each committee shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

(a) To evaluate those licensees who request participation in the program according to the guidelines prescribed by the board, and to make recommendations.

(b) To review and designate those treatment facilities and services to which a participant in the program may be referred.

(c) To receive and review information concerning participants in the program.

(d) To consider whether each participant in the treatment program may safely continue or resume the practice of medicine.

(e) To prepare quarterly reports to be submitted to the board, which include, but are not limited to, information concerning the number of cases accepted, denied, or terminated with compliance or noncompliance and a cost analysis of the program.

(f) To promote the program to the public and within the profession, including providing all current licentiates with written information concerning the program.

(g) To perform such other related duties, under the direction of the board or the program manager, as the board may by regulation require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 548, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2367.

(a) Each licensee who requests participation in a treatment program shall agree to cooperate with the treatment program designed by the committee and approved by the program manager. The committee shall inform each participant in the program of the procedures followed, the rights and responsibilities of the participant, and the possible results of noncompliance with the program. Any failure to comply with the treatment program may result in termination of participation.

(b) Participation in a program under this article shall not be a defense to any disciplinary action which may be taken by the board. Further, no provision of this article shall preclude the board from commencing disciplinary action against a licensee who is terminated from a program established pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 548, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2368.

An administrative fee to be established by the board, may be charged for participation in the program; all costs of treatment shall be paid by the participant. These fees shall be deposited into the Contingent Fund of the Osteopathic Medical Board of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 359, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

2369.

(a) After the committee and the program manager, in their discretion, have determined that a participant has been rehabilitated and the program is completed, the committee shall purge and destroy all records pertaining to the participation in a treatment program.

(b) Except as authorized by subdivision (f) of Section 2365, all board and committee records and records of proceedings pertaining to the treatment of a participant in a program shall be confidential and are not subject to discovery or subpoena except in the case of discovery or subpoena in any criminal proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 548, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2370.

The board shall provide for the representation of any persons making reports to the diversion evaluation committee or to the board under this article in any action for defamation for reports or information given to the committee or the board regarding a licensee’s participation in the diversion program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 384, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Exemptions from Liability [2395. - 2398.]

2395.

No licensee, who in good faith renders emergency care at the scene of an emergency, shall be liable for any civil damages as a result of any acts or omissions by such person in rendering the emergency care.

“The scene of an emergency” as used in this section shall include, but not be limited to, the emergency rooms of hospitals in the event of a medical disaster. “Medical disaster” means a duly proclaimed state of emergency or local emergency declared pursuant to the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

Acts or omissions exempted from liability pursuant to this section shall include those acts or omissions which occur after the declaration of a medical disaster and those which occurred prior to such declaration but after the commencement of such medical disaster. The immunity granted in this section shall not apply in the event of a willful act or omission.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2395.5.

(a) A licensee who serves on an on-call basis to a hospital emergency room, who in good faith renders emergency obstetrical services to a person while serving on-call, shall not be liable for any civil damages as a result of any negligent act or omission by the licensee in rendering the emergency obstetrical services. The immunity granted by this section shall not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross negligence, recklessness, or willful misconduct.

(b) The protections of subdivision (a) shall not apply to the licensee in any of the following cases:

(1) Consideration in any form was provided to the licensee for serving, or the licensee was required to serve, on an on-call basis to the hospital emergency room. In either event, the protections of subdivision (a) shall not apply unless the hospital expressly, in writing, accepts liability for the licensee’s negligent acts or omissions.

(2) The licensee had provided prior medical diagnosis or treatment to the same patient for a condition having a bearing on or relevance to the treatment of the obstetrical condition which required emergency services.

(3) Before rendering emergency obstetrical services, the licensee had a contractual obligation or agreement with the patient, another licensee, or a third-party payer on the patient’s behalf to provide obstetrical care for the patient, or the licensee had a reasonable expectation of payment for the emergency services provided to the patient.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b), nothing in this section shall be construed to affect or modify the liability of the hospital for ordinary or gross negligence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1306, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2396.

No licensee, who in good faith upon the request of another person so licensed, renders emergency medical care to a person for medical complication arising from prior care by another person so licensed, shall be liable for any civil damages as a result of any acts or omissions by such licensed person in rendering such emergency medical care.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2397.

(a) A licensee shall not be liable for civil damages for injury or death caused in an emergency situation occurring in the licensee’s office or in a hospital on account of a failure to inform a patient of the possible consequences of a medical procedure where the failure to inform is caused by any of the following:

(1) The patient was unconscious.

(2) The medical procedure was undertaken without the consent of the patient because the licensee reasonably believed that a medical procedure should be undertaken immediately and that there was insufficient time to fully inform the patient.

(3) A medical procedure was performed on a person legally incapable of giving consent, and the licensee reasonably believed that a medical procedure should be
 undertaken immediately and that there was insufficient time to obtain the informed consent of a person authorized to give such consent for the patient.

(b) This section is applicable only to actions for damages for injuries or death arising because of a licensee’s failure to inform, and not to actions for damages arising because of a licensee’s negligence in rendering or failing to render treatment.

(c) As used in this section:

(1) “Hospital” means a licensed general acute care hospital as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Emergency situation occurring in the licensee’s office” means a situation occurring in an office, other than a hospital, used by a licensee for the examination or treatment of patients, requiring immediate services for alleviation of severe pain, or immediate diagnosis and treatment of unforeseeable medical conditions, which, if not
 immediately diagnosed and treated, would lead to serious disability or death.

(3) “Emergency situation occurring in a hospital” means a situation occurring in a hospital, whether or not it occurs in an emergency room, requiring immediate services for alleviation of severe pain, or immediate diagnosis and treatment of unforeseeable medical conditions, which, if not immediately diagnosed and treated, would lead to serious disability or death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 105, Sec. 1.   (SB 953)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2398.

No licensee, who in good faith and without compensation renders voluntary emergency medical assistance to a participant in a community college or high school athletic event or contest, at the site of the event or contest, or during transportation to a health care facility, for an injury suffered in the course of such event or contest, shall be liable for any civil damages as a result of any acts or omissions by such person in rendering such voluntary medical assistance. The immunity granted by this section shall not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross negligence.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18. Corporations [2400. - 2417.5.]

2400.

Corporations and other artificial legal entities shall have no professional rights, privileges, or powers. However, the Division of Licensing may in its discretion, after such investigation and review of such documentary evidence as it may require, and under regulations adopted by it, grant approval of the employment of licensees on a salary basis by licensed charitable institutions, foundations, or clinics, if no charge for professional services rendered patients is made by any such institution, foundation, or clinic.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2401.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 2400, a clinic operated primarily for the purpose of medical education by a public or private nonprofit university medical school, which is approved by the board or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, may charge for professional services rendered to teaching patients by licensees who hold academic appointments on the faculty of the university, if the charges are approved by the physician and surgeon in whose name the charges are made.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 2400, a clinic operated under subdivision (p) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code may employ licensees and charge for professional services rendered by those licensees. However, the clinic shall not interfere with, control, or otherwise direct the professional
 judgment of a physician and surgeon in a manner prohibited by Section 2400 or any other law.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 2400, a narcotic treatment program operated under Section 11876 of the Health and Safety Code and regulated by the State Department of Health Care Services, may employ licensees and charge for professional services rendered by those licensees. However, the narcotic treatment program shall not interfere with, control, or otherwise direct the professional judgment of a physician and surgeon in a manner prohibited by Section 2400 or any other law.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 2400, a hospital that is owned and operated by a licensed charitable organization, that offers only pediatric subspecialty care, that, before January 1, 2013, employed licensees on a salary basis, and that has not charged for professional services rendered to patients may, commencing January 1,
 2013, charge for professional services rendered to patients, provided the following conditions are met:

(1) The hospital does not increase the number of salaried licensees by more than five licensees each year.

(2) The hospital does not expand its scope of services beyond pediatric subspecialty care.

(3) The hospital accepts each patient needing its scope of services regardless of the patient’s ability to pay, including whether the patient has any form of health care coverage.

(4) The medical staff concur by an affirmative vote that the licensee’s employment is in the best interest of the communities served by the hospital.

(5) The hospital does not interfere with, control, or otherwise
 direct a physician and surgeon’s professional judgment in a manner prohibited by Section 2400 or any other law.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 2400, a federally certified critical access hospital may employ licensees and charge for professional services rendered by those licensees to patients, provided both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The medical staff concur by an affirmative vote that the licensee’s employment is in the best interest of the communities served by the hospital.

(2) The hospital does not interfere with, control, or otherwise direct a physician and surgeon’s professional judgment in a manner prohibited by Section 2400 or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 641, Sec. 1.   (AB 242)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2402.

The provisions of Section 2400 do not apply to a medical or podiatry corporation practicing pursuant to the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code) and this article, when such corporation is in compliance with the requirements of these statutes and all other statutes and regulations now or hereafter enacted or adopted pertaining to such corporations and the conduct of their affairs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2403.

The provisions of Section 2400 do not apply to physicians and surgeons or doctors of podiatric medicine enrolled in approved residency postgraduate training programs or fellowship programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 515, Sec. 16.   (SB 304)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2406.

A medical corporation or podiatry corporation is a corporation that is authorized to render professional services, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, so long as that corporation and its shareholders, officers, directors, and employees rendering professional services who are physicians and surgeons, psychologists, registered nurses, optometrists, podiatrists, chiropractors, acupuncturists, naturopathic doctors, physical therapists, occupational therapists, or, in the case of a medical corporation only, physician assistants, marriage and family therapists, clinical counselors, or clinical social workers, are in compliance with the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, the provisions of this article, and all
 other statutes and regulations now or hereafter enacted or adopted pertaining to the corporation and the conduct of its affairs.

With respect to a medical corporation or podiatry corporation, the governmental agency referred to in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act is the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 620, Sec. 2.   (AB 1000)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2406.5.

(a) When a physician and surgeon, podiatrist, or other referring practitioner refers a patient to receive services by a physical therapist employed by a professional corporation as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, the referring practitioner shall comply with Article 6 (commencing with Section 650) of Chapter 1, and shall provide notice of the following to the patient, orally and in writing, in at least 14-point type and signed by the patient:

(1) That the patient may seek physical therapy treatment services from a physical therapy provider of his or her choice who may not necessarily be employed by the medical or podiatry corporation.

(2) If the patient chooses to be treated by an employed physical therapist, any financial interest the referring practitioner has in the corporation.

(b) This section shall not apply to a physician and surgeon, podiatrist, or other referring practitioner who is in a medical group with which a health care service plan, that is licensed pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) and is also exempt from federal taxation pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, exclusively contracts to provide professional medical services for its enrollees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 620, Sec. 3.   (AB 1000)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2407.

A medical or podiatry corporation shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 2285 and 2415.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1314, Sec. 4.2.)
-------------------------------------------

2408.

Except as provided in Sections 13401.5 and 13403 of the Corporations Code, each shareholder, director and officer of a medical or podiatry corporation, except an assistant secretary or an assistant treasurer, shall be a licensed person as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or Sections 13401.5, 13403, 13406, and 13407 of the Corporations Code, a shareholder of a medical corporation which renders professional services may be a medical corporation which has only one shareholder who shall be a licensed person as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code. The shareholder of the latter corporation may be an officer or director of the former corporation.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting a nonlicensed person from using the business titles of executive vice president, chief executive officer, executive secretary, or any other title denoting an administrative function within the professional corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 505, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2409.

The income of a medical and podiatry corporation attributable to professional services rendered while a shareholder is a disqualified person, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, shall not in any manner accrue to the benefit of such shareholder or his or her shares in such a professional corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1314, Sec. 4.4.)
-------------------------------------------

2410.

A medical or podiatry corporation shall not do or fail to do any act the doing of which or the failure to do which would constitute unprofessional conduct under any statute or regulation now or hereafter in effect. In the conduct of its practice, it shall observe and be bound by such statutes and regulations to the same extent as a licensee under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1314, Sec. 4.5.)
-------------------------------------------

2411.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the offering and operation by a medical corporation of a health care service plan licensed pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code is hereby authorized. For such purpose a medical corporation may employ, or enter into contracts or other arrangements with, any person or persons authorized to practice any of the healing arts, but no such employment, contract, or arrangement shall provide for the rendering, supervision, or control of professional services other than as authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1314, Sec. 4.6.)
-------------------------------------------

2412.

The Division of Licensing may adopt and enforce regulations to carry out the purposes and objectives of this article and the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act including regulations requiring (a) that the bylaws of a medical or podiatry corporation shall include a provision whereby the capital stock of such corporation owned by a disqualified person (as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code), or a deceased person, shall be sold to the corporation or to the remaining shareholders of such corporation within such time as such regulations may provide, and (b) that a medical or podiatry corporation shall provide adequate security by insurance or otherwise for claims against it by its patients arising out of the rendering of professional services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1314, Sec. 4.7.)
-------------------------------------------

2413.

This article shall apply to medical corporations which have physicians and surgeons licensed by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California as shareholders, officers, and directors only to the extent that this article is not in conflict with or inconsistent with Section 2454.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 359, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

2415.

(a) Any physician and surgeon or any doctor of podiatric medicine, as the case may be, who as a sole proprietor, or in a partnership, group, or professional corporation, desires to practice under any name that would otherwise be a violation of Section 2285 may practice under that name if the proprietor, partnership, group, or corporation obtains and maintains in current status a fictitious-name permit issued by the Division of Licensing, or, in the case of doctors of podiatric medicine, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, under the provisions of this section.

(b) The division or the board shall issue a fictitious-name permit authorizing the
 holder thereof to use the name specified in the permit in connection with his, her, or its practice if the division or the board finds to its satisfaction that:

(1) The applicant or applicants or shareholders of the professional corporation hold valid and current licenses as physicians and surgeons or doctors of podiatric medicine, as the case may be.

(2) The professional practice of the applicant or applicants is wholly owned and entirely controlled by the applicant or applicants.

(3) The name under which the applicant or applicants propose to practice is not deceptive, misleading, or confusing.

(c) Each permit shall be accompanied by a notice that shall be displayed
 in a location readily visible to patients and staff. The notice shall be displayed at each place of business identified in the permit.

(d) This section shall not apply to licensees who contract with, are employed by, or are on the staff of, any clinic licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code or any medical school approved by the division or a faculty practice plan connected with that medical school.

(e) Fictitious-name permits issued under this section shall be subject to Article 19 (commencing with Section 2421) pertaining to renewal of licenses.

(f) The division or the board may revoke or suspend any permit issued
 if it finds that the holder or holders of the permit are not in compliance with the provisions of this section or any regulations adopted pursuant to this section. A proceeding to revoke or suspend a fictitious-name permit shall be conducted in accordance with Section 2230.

(g) A fictitious-name permit issued to any licensee in a sole practice is automatically revoked in the event the licensee’s certificate to practice medicine or podiatric medicine is revoked.

(h) The division or the board may delegate to the executive director, or to another official of the board, its authority to review and approve applications for fictitious-name permits and to issue those permits.

(i) The California Board of Podiatric Medicine shall
 administer and enforce this section as to doctors of podiatric medicine and shall adopt and administer regulations specifying appropriate podiatric medical name designations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 76.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2416.

Physicians and surgeons and doctors of podiatric medicine may conduct their professional practices in a partnership or group of physicians and surgeons or a partnership or group of doctors of podiatric medicine, respectively. Physicians and surgeons and doctors of podiatric medicine may establish a professional partnership that includes both physician and surgeons and doctors of podiatric medicine, if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) A majority of the partners and partnership interests in the professional partnership are physicians and surgeons, osteopathic physicians and surgeons, or doctors of podiatric medicine.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 5 (commencing with
 Section 16100) of Title 2 of the Corporations Code, a partner who is not a physician and surgeon shall not practice in the partnership or vote on partnership matters related to the practice of medicine that are outside the partner’s scope of practice. All partners may vote on general administrative, management, and business matters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 166, Sec. 1.   (AB 834)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2417.

(a) If the Department of Insurance has evidence that a business is being operated in violation of this chapter, Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of the Corporations Code, or Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, and that the business may be in violation of Section 1871.4 of the Insurance Code or Section 549 or 550 of the Penal Code, then the department shall report the business, and any physician and surgeon suspected of knowingly providing medical services for that business relative to a violation of Section 1871.4 of the Insurance Code or Section 549 or 550 of the Penal Code, to the appropriate regulatory agency. Upon receiving a report from the Department of Insurance of a suspected violation, the regulatory agency shall conduct an investigation. The requirement in subdivision (a) of Section 1872.95 of the Insurance Code for investigations to be conducted within existing resources does not apply to investigations required by this section. The Department of Insurance may consult with the appropriate regulatory department or agency prior to making its report to that department or agency, and this consultation shall not be deemed to require the department or agency to conduct an investigation.

(b) A physician and surgeon who practices medicine with a business organization knowing that it is owned or operated in violation of Section 1871.4 of the Insurance Code, Section 14107 or 14107.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or Section 549 or 550 of the Penal Code shall have his or her license to practice permanently revoked.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 328, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2417.5.

(a) A business organization that offers to provide, or provides, outpatient elective cosmetic medical procedures or treatments, that is owned or operated in violation of Section 2400, and that contracts with, or otherwise employs, a physician and surgeon to facilitate its offers to provide, or the provision of, outpatient elective cosmetic medical procedures or treatments that may be provided only by the holder of a valid physician’s and surgeon’s certificate is guilty of violating paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 550 of the Penal Code.

(b) For purposes of this section, “outpatient elective cosmetic medical procedures or treatments” means medical procedures
 or treatments that are performed to alter or reshape normal structures of the body solely in order to improve appearance.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter or apply to arrangements currently authorized by law, including, but not limited to, any entity operating a medical facility or other business authorized to provide medical services under Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 140, Sec. 2.   (AB 1548)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18.5. Locum Tenens Services [2418. - 2418.]

2418.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The State of California is facing a growing crisis in physician supply due, in part, to difficulties in recruiting and retaining physicians.

(2) This crisis is particularly harsh for facilities operated by the state and local governments due to the difficulties of funding full-time medical staff.

(3) Locum tenens physicians provide a critical source of medical services that virtually all hospitals in California use at one time or another every year.

(4) The great majority of California hospitals, and many medical groups and other providers, including many state-supported facilities, use locum tenens agencies either continuously or from time to time to help fill their medical staffing needs.

(5) Most locum tenens agencies are barred from employing physicians under the corporate practice doctrine (Article 18 (commencing with Section 2400)) and, thus, do not employ the physicians whose locum tenens services they arrange.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a “locum tenens agency” shall not be deemed to be an employer, employment agency, employment counseling service, job listing service, nurse’s registry, temporary services employer, or leasing employer of a licensee.

(c) A locum tenens agency is an individual or entity that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Contracts with clients or customers to identify licensees willing to perform locum tenens services and to arrange for the licensees to perform locum tenens services for the clients or customers on a temporary, nonpermanent basis .

(2) Arranges for the licensees to perform locum tenens services only to those clients and customers that are legally authorized to enter into independent contractor arrangements with licensees.

(3) Does not determine the rates of payment made to a licensee providing locum tenens services, or determine the hours of work by the licensee.

(4) Receives payment directly from its clients or customers for its services which, to the degree that the payment includes payment for the locum tenens services, remits the payment for the locum tenens services in full directly to the licensee.

(5) Charges fees that are reasonably related to the value of the services that the locum tenens agency provides its clients and customers, and that are in no way related to the quantity or value of locum tenens services provided by the licensee. This section does not prohibit a locum tenens agency from charging its clients and customers based on the number of days or hours that the locum tenens services are provided or based on the particular speciality of the locum tenens services.

(d) A locum tenens agency shall not employ a licensee to perform locum tenens services, nor shall it interfere with or attempt to influence the clinical judgment of a licensee providing locum tenens services.

(e) It shall be a rebuttable presumption that the relationship between the client or customer of the locum tenens agency and the licensee providing locum tenens services is one of an independent contractor, pursuant to Section 656 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, “licensee” means a physician and surgeon licensed under this chapter.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section confirm and be declaratory of, rather than change, existing law.

(h) Nothing in this section shall apply to a category of health care professionals other than those specified.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 596, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 19. Renewal of Licenses [2421. - 2433.]

2421.

As used in this article, the terms:

(a) “License” includes “certificate,” “permit,” and “registration.”

(b) “Licensee” includes the holder of a license.

(c) “Licensing authority” means the board, which has jurisdiction over a particular licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 78.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2423.

(a) All physician and surgeon’s certificates, and certificates to practice midwifery, research psychoanalyst registrations, polysomnographic trainee, technician, and technologist registrations, and fictitious-name permits shall expire at 12 midnight on the last day of the month in which the license was issued during the second year of a two-year term commencing from the date of issuance beginning July 1, 2018.

(b) To renew an unexpired license, the licensee shall, on or before the dates on which it would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the licensing authority and pay the prescribed renewal
 fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 80.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2424.

Notwithstanding Section 163.5, any licensee of the board or the California Board of Podiatric Medicine who does not renew the licensee’s expired license within 30 days of its date of expiration shall pay all the following fees:
